Hawaii statutes.
§832-6 Extradition of persons not present
in demanding state at time of commission of crime. The governor of this
State may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any state,
any person in this State charged in the state in the manner provided in section
832-3 with committing an act in this State, or in another state, intentionally
resulting in a crime in the state whose executive authority is making the
demand, and this chapter not otherwise inconsistent, shall apply to such cases,
even though the accused was not in that state at the time of the commission of
the crime, and has not fled therefrom. [L 1941, c 99, §6; RL 1945, §10636; RL
1955, §250-6; HRS §713-6; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next